District of Columbia statutes.
4-261.21

Implementation of transitional Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program Benefits.

A qualified household that ceases to receive cash assistance under the District’s Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (“TANF”) program, funded by federal TANF funds, District Maintenance of Effort (“MOE”) funds, or any other cash assistance received under a state-funded program (collectively “cash assistance”) due to a change in income, shall receive transitional Supplemental Nutrition Assistance program (“SNAP”) benefits for a period of 5 months after the date on which the cash assistance was terminated, automatically adjusted for the loss of the cash assistance, pursuant to section 11(s) of the Food Stamp Act Food Stamp Act of 1964, approved August 31, 1964 (78 Stat. 703; 7 U.S.C. § 2020(s) ) (“Food Stamp Act”).

History

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 5082, 57 DCR 6242

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5082 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).

Short Title

Short title: Section 5081 of D.C. Law 18-223 provided that subtitle I of title V of the act may be cited as the “SNAP Expansion Act of 2010”.